Florida, session 2026, HB1147.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1013.041, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1013.041 Statewide inventory of unimproved real property
owned by school districts.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Department" means the Department of Education.
(b) "District" means each school district as defined in s.
1001.30.
(c) "Unimproved real property" means any parcel of land
owned in whole or in part by a district that does not contain
any vertical improvements, including, but not limited to,
buildings, permanent structures, or constructed facilities.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1147-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1147 2026
(2) DATA COLLECTION REQUIREMENTS.—
(a) Each district shall annually, by a date established by
the department, submit to the department a complete inventory of
all unimproved real property owned by the district as of June 30
of that year.
(b) For each parcel of unimproved real property, the
district must provide all of the following data to the
department in a format prescribed by the department:
1. The parcel identification number.
2. The acreage of the parcel.
3. The address or descriptive location of the parcel.
4. The date of acquisition of parcel by the district.
5. The current use of the parcel, if any.
6. The fair market value of the parcel, calculated using:
a. The most recent market value assessed by the county
property appraiser; or
b. A district-commissioned appraisal completed within the
previous 24 months.
(3) STATEWIDE REPORT.—The department shall compile the
data collected pursuant to subsection (2) into a statewide
report, which must include:
(a) The total statewide acreage of all unimproved real
property owned by districts.
(b) The aggregate statewide fair market value of such
property.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1147-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1147 2026
(c) A district-by-district breakdown of such unimproved
real property, including:
1. The total number of parcels per district.
2. The total acreage per district.
3. The total fair market value of such parcels per
district.
4. Each parcel's identification number and acreage.
(d) Any trends or findings the department determines
relevant to effective statewide land use or long-range
facilities planning.
(4) PUBLICATION.—The department shall publish the
statewide report on its website by December 1, 2026, and every 3
years thereafter.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1147-01-c1